Utah statutes.
70C-7-105.   Extortionate extensions of credit.
If it is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time an
extension of credit is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make
repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause
harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person, the repayment of
the extension of credit is unenforceable through any judicial proceedings
against the debtor.
